tests/v_кай_del.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "The verb кай":
    кай<v><iv><pres><p1><sg> : каятӑп
    кай<v><iv><pres><p2><sg> : каятӑн
    кай<v><iv><pres><p3><sg> : каятӑть
    кай<v><iv><pres><p1><pl> : каятпӑр
    кай<v><iv><pres><p2><pl> : каятӑр
    кай<v><iv><pres><p3><pl> : каяҫҫӗ
    кай<v><iv><imp><p1><sg> : каям
    кай<v><iv><imp><p2><sg> : кай
    кай<v><iv><imp><p3><sg> : кайтӑр
    кай<v><iv><imp><p1><pl> : каяр
    кай<v><iv><imp><p2><pl> : кайӑр
    кай<v><iv><imp><p3><pl> : кайччӑр
    кай<v><iv><fut><p1><sg> : кайӑп
    кай<v><iv><fut><p2><sg> : кайӑн
    кай<v><iv><fut><p3><sg> : кайӗ
    кай<v><iv><fut><p1><pl> : кайӑпӑр
    кай<v><iv><fut><p2><pl> : кайӑр
    кай<v><iv><fut><p3><pl> : кайӗҫ
    кай<v><iv><cond><p1><sg> : кайӑттӑм
    кай<v><iv><cond><p2><sg> : кайӑттӑн
    кай<v><iv><cond><p3><sg> : кайӗччӗ
    кай<v><iv><cond><p1><pl> : кайӑттӑмӑр
    кай<v><iv><cond><p2><pl> : кайӑттӑр
    кай<v><iv><cond><p3><pl> : кайӗччӗҫ
    кай<v><iv><opt><p1><sg> : кайӑпин
    кай<v><iv><opt><p2><sg> : кайӑсӑн
    кай<v><iv><opt><p3><sg> : кайин
    кай<v><iv><opt><p1><pl> : кайӑпӑрин
    кай<v><iv><opt><p2><pl> : кайӑсӑр
    кай<v><iv><opt><p3><pl> : кайӗҫин
    кай<v><iv><abil><pres><p1><sg> : каяятӑп
    кай<v><iv><abil><pres><p2><sg> : каяятӑн
    кай<v><iv><abil><pres><p3><sg> : каяятӑть
    кай<v><iv><abil><pres><p1><pl> : каяятпӑр
    кай<v><iv><abil><pres><p2><pl> : каяятӑр
    кай<v><iv><abil><pres><p3><pl> : каяяҫҫӗ
